Utah statutes.
53A-21-201.   Capital Outlay Foundation Program -- Creation -- Definitions.

(1)  There is created the Capital Outlay Foundation Program to provide capital outlay funding to a school district based on a district's local property tax effort and property tax yield per student compared to a foundation guarantee funding level.

(2)  As used in this part:

(a)  "Foundation guarantee level per ADM" means a minimum revenue amount per ADM generated by the base tax effort rate, including the following:

(i)  the revenue generated locally from a school district's combined capital levy rate; and

(ii)  the revenue allocated to a school district by the State Board of Education in accordance with Section 53A-21-202.

(b)  "Qualifying school district" means a school district with a property tax yield per ADM less than the foundation guarantee level per ADM.

(3)  "Small school district" means a school district that has fewer than 1,000 pupils in average daily membership.

